Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.440

Commission to consider amending rules—Retired active physicians.

(1) The commission shall consider amending its rules on retired active physicians in a manner that improves access to health care services for the citizens of this state without compromising public safety. When considering whether to amend its rules, the commission shall, at a minimum, consider the following:

(a) Whether physicians holding retired active licenses should be allowed to provide health care services beyond primary care;

(b) Whether physicians holding retired active licenses should be allowed to provide health care services in settings beyond community clinics operated by public or private tax-exempt corporations; and

(c) The number and type of continuing education hours that physicians holding retired active licenses shall be required to obtain.

(2) The commission shall determine whether it will amend its rules in the manner suggested by this section no later than November 15, 2009. If the commission determines that it will not amend its rules, it shall provide a written explanation of its decision to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1, 2009.

[ 2009 c 403 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 403: See note following RCW 18.71.080.